California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter shall be fixed by the board in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The fee for filing each application for licensure as a professional engineer and each application for authority level designation at not more than four hundred dollars ($400) and for each application for certification as an engineer-in-training at not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) The fee to take an examination administered by a public or private organization pursuant to Section 6754 shall be no greater than the actual cost of the development and administration of the examination and may be paid directly to the
 organization by the applicant.

(3) The renewal fee for each branch of professional engineering in which licensure is held, and the renewal fee for each authority level designation held, at no more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(4) The fee for a retired license at not more than 50 percent of the professional engineer application fee in effect on the date of application.

(5) The delinquency fee at not more than 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of reinstatement.

(6) The board shall establish by regulation an appeal fee for examination. The regulation shall include provisions for an applicant to be reimbursed the appeal fee if the appeal results in passage of examination. The fee charged shall be no more than the costs incurred by the
 board.

(7) All other document fees are to be set by the board by rule.

(b) Applicants wishing to be examined in more than one branch of engineering shall be required to pay the additional fee for each examination after the first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 9.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.5. Locksmiths [6980. - 6981.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6980. - 6980.]

6980.

The following terms as used in this chapter have the meaning expressed in this article:

(a) “Branch office” means any additional physical location, other than the principal place of business of a licensee, where any locksmith service is provided. Branch office includes the California office of any out-of-state business conducting, directing, dispatching, or managing a locksmith business, service, or service providers in California. A telephone answering service or a telephone call-forwarding device, for routing calls within the immediate geographic area, shall not be deemed to be a branch office.

(b) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(c) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(e) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(f) “Employer” means a person who employs an individual for wages or salary, lists the individual on the employer’s payroll records, and withholds all legally required deductions and contributions.

(g) “Employee” means an individual who works for an employer, is listed on the employer’s payroll records, and is under the employer’s direction and control. An independent contractor is not an employee pursuant to this chapter.

(h) “Employer-employee relationship” means an individual who works for another and where the individual’s name appears on the payroll records of the employer.

(i) “Licensee” means a business entity, whether an individual, partnership, or corporation, licensed under this chapter.

(j) “Locksmith” means any person who, for any consideration or compensation whatsoever, engages, directly or indirectly and as a primary or secondary object, in the business of rekeying, installing, repairing, opening, modifying locks, or who originates keys for locks, including, but not limited to, electronic cloning of transponder keys and any other electronic programming of automotive keys and electronic operating devices, such as key fobs, door and ignition key devices, and successive electronic and other high-security key technology. A “locksmith” does not mean a person whose activities are limited to making a duplicate key from an existing key.

(k) “Person” means any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, or corporation.

(l) “Registrant” means an employee registered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(m) “Lock” means any mechanical, electromechanical, electronic, or electromagnetic device, or similar device, including any peripheral hardware, that is designed to control access from one area to another, or that is designed to control the use of a device, including, but not limited to, a safe, vault, or safe deposit box.

(n) “Recombination” means changing the combination of any combination-actuated lock.

(o) “Master key system” means any system in which a lock is rekeyed so that the lock can be operated by its own individual key and can also be operated by a key that can operate other locks if the other locks cannot be operated with the lock’s individual key.

(p) “Key duplication machine” means any tool whose only capability is to manufacture a new key by using an existing key as a guide, which includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Standard key duplication machines that are limited to duplication of a metallic key from an existing metallic key, standard single- or double-sided key, including a plastic “credit card” emergency key.

(2) High-security key machines that include the duplication of restricted keys, such as sidewinders and laser cut styles of machines.

(3) Transponder cloning and reprogramming machines that transfer electronic codes and signals and successive technology to keys, fobs, and door and ignition operating devices.

(q) “Key blank” means a key that has not been altered or cut and does not include depth keys.

(r) “Pin kit” means a container that holds only the following lock parts and materials:

(1) Bottom pins.

(2) Top pins (not including master pins).

(3) Springs.

(4) Plug follower.

(5) Proprietary tools, provided by a lock manufacturer, designed for the purpose of rekeying a lock.

(s) “Locksmith tool” means (1) any tool designed for the purpose of opening, bypassing, altering, rekeying, servicing, or repairing any lock, or (2) any burglar tool, as described in Section 466 of the Penal Code.

(t) “Motor service vehicle” means any vehicle, as defined in Section 6161 of the Vehicle Code, or other mode of transportation, that is used in the business of rekeying, installing, repairing, opening, or modifying locks, or originating keys for locks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [6980.1. - 6980.9.]

6980.1.

There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services. The bureau is under the supervision and control of the director. The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.2.

The Governor shall appoint a chief of the bureau at a salary to be fixed in accordance with Section 12080.3 of the Government Code. The chief shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.3.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, and Section 159.5, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel, as well as an assistant chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in Section 159.5, all personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and direction of the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.4.

The chief shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any rule or regulation established under this chapter by unlicensed persons who engage in a business for which a license is required under this chapter, and shall furnish the evidence to prosecuting officers of any county, city, or city and county for the purpose of prosecuting those violations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.5.

It shall be the duty of the chief to initiate and conduct investigations into the business operations of any locksmith, on his or her own motion, if the locksmith is not operating in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or there has been a written complaint to the bureau about the actions and conduct of the locksmith or his or her employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.6.

(a) Every power and duty granted to, or imposed upon, the director under this chapter may be delegated to the chief, except that the director may not delegate authority to adopt, or otherwise act upon, any proposed decision of a hearing officer after a hearing under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The chief may delegate any power or duty granted to, or imposed upon, him or her under this chapter to the deputy chief, the assistant chief, or any inspection, investigation, or auditing personnel of the bureau or the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.7.

(a) The director may adopt and enforce rules and regulations as may be reasonable and necessary for issuing licenses to applicants, for the conduct of the licensees, or for the general enforcement of this chapter in the protection of the public.

(b) These rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.8.

The chief or his or her designee may inspect, examine, or investigate the relevant records, books, accounts, and files created and maintained by a locksmith. The chief shall have access to those relevant business records necessary to the examination for the purpose of performing a random audit to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.9.

It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with Section 128.5 of the Business and Professions Code, that the bureau shall not maintain a reserve balance of funds greater than the amount necessary to fund operating expenses of the bureau and that the bureau shall periodically review fees pursuant to this chapter to evaluate the appropriateness of each fee and the regulatory costs associated with each fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 18.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [6980.10. - 6980.15.]

6980.10.

(a) No person shall engage within this state in the activities of a locksmith as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 6980, unless the person holds a valid locksmith license, is registered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Any person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment:

(1) Acts as or represents himself or herself to be a licensee under this chapter when that person is not a licensee under this chapter.

(2) Falsely represents that he or she is employed by a licensee under this chapter when he or she is not employed by a licensee under this chapter.

(3) Carries a badge, identification card, or business card, indicating that he or she is a licensee under this chapter when he or she is not a licensee under this chapter.

(4) Uses a letterhead or other written or electronically generated materials indicating that he or she is a licensee under this chapter when he or she is not a licensee under this chapter.

(5) Advertises that he or she is a licensee under this chapter when he or she is not a licensee under this chapter.

(c) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (b) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.12.

This chapter does not apply to the following persons:

(a) A person, or his or her agent or employee, who is the manufacturer of a product, other than locks and keys, and who installs, repairs, opens, or modifies locks or who makes keys for the locks of that product as a normal incident to its marketing.

(b) An employee who is an industrial or institutional locksmith, provided that the employee provides locksmith services only to a single employer that does not provide locksmith services for hire to the public for any consideration or compensation whatsoever.

(c) A tow truck driver who does not originate keys for locks and whose locksmith services are limited
 to opening motor vehicles.

(d) A person employed exclusively and regularly by a state correctional institution, or other state or federal agency, and who does not provide locksmith services for hire to the public for any consideration or compensation whatsoever.

(e) (1) A person registered with the bureau pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) if the duties of that person’s position that constitute locksmithing are ancillary to the primary duties and functions of that person’s position.

(2) A person licensed, certified, or registered pursuant to Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 7590) if the duties of that person’s position that constitute locksmithing are performed in combination with the installation, maintenance, moving, repairing, replacing, servicing, or reconfiguration
 of an alarm system, as defined in Section 7590.1, and limited to work on electronic locks or access control devices that are controlled by an alarm system control device, including the removal of existing hardware.

(f) An agent or employee of a retail establishment that has a primary business other than providing locksmith services, providing all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The services provided by the retail establishment are limited to rekeying and recombination of locks.

(2) All rekeying, recombination, and installation of locks must take place on the premises of the retail establishment.

(3) All rekeying, recombination, and installation services provided by the retail establishment subject to this chapter are limited to locks purchased on
 the retail establishment’s premises and are conducted prior to purchasers taking possession of the locks.

(4) An unlicensed agent or employee of the retail establishment shall not advertise or represent himself or herself to be licensed under this chapter, and an agent or employee of the retail establishment shall not advertise or represent himself or herself to be a locksmith.

(5) An agent or employee of the retail establishment shall not design or implement a master key system, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 6980.

(6) An agent or employee of the retail establishment shall not rekey, change the combination of, alter, or install any automotive locks.

(7) The retail establishment shall not have on its premises any locksmith tool, as defined in
 subdivision (s) of Section 6980, other than the following:

(A) Standard key duplication machines.

(B) Key blanks.

(C) Pin kits.

(g) A law enforcement officer employed by any city, county, city and county, state, or federal law enforcement agency, if all services are performed during the course of the officer’s professional duties.

(h) A firefighter or emergency medical person employed by any city, county, city and county, district, or state agency, if all services are performed during the course of duties as a firefighter or emergency medical person.

(i) A new motor vehicle dealer, as defined in Section 426 of the Vehicle
 Code, and an employee of a new motor vehicle dealer acting within the scope of employment at a dealership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.13.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or who conspires with another person to violate any provision of this chapter, or who knowingly engages a nonexempt or unlicensed locksmith after being notified in writing by the bureau of the individual’s unlicensed status with the bureau, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (a) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(c) Any person who is convicted of a violation of this section or Section 6980.10 shall not be issued a license for a period of one year following a first conviction and shall not be issued a license for a period of five years following a second or subsequent conviction of this section or Section 6980.10 or any combination of those sections.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the prosecuting officer of any county or city shall prosecute all violations of this chapter occurring within his or her jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.14.

(a) The superior court in and for the county where any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act that constitutes a violation of this chapter, or where any person engages in the business of a locksmith after the revocation or expiration of any license or during the period of suspension of any license, may, upon application of the chief or any person licensed under these provisions or any association representing those licensees or any member of the general public, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining this conduct and may impose civil fines not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that there shall be no requirement to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(b) During the period of revocation, expiration, or suspension, any business telephone number used to conduct, direct, operate, dispatch, manage, or utilize an illegal, nonexempt, or unlicensed locksmith business, locksmith service, service provider, or related activity, may be disconnected by ruling of the chief.

(c) The superior court for the county in which any person has engaged in any act that constitutes a violation of this chapter may, upon a petition filed by the chief with the approval of the director, order this person to make restitution to persons injured as a result of the violation.

(d) The court may order a person subject to an injunction or restraining order, provided for in subdivision (a), or subject to an order requiring restitution pursuant to subdivision (c), to reimburse the bureau for expenses incurred by the bureau in its investigation related to its petition.

(e) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (a) and enjoin the unlicensed operation may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(f) The remedy provided for by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy provided for in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.15.

No person engaged in performing any service requiring a license under this chapter may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act or agreement, without alleging and proving, that the person was duly licensed at all times during the performance of the act or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses [6980.17. - 6980.33.]

6980.17.

(a) An application for a locksmith license shall be made and filed with the chief in the form as may be required by the director, and shall be accompanied by the application fee prescribed by this chapter. The chief may require the submission of any other relevant information, evidence, statements, or documents.

(b) Every application for a locksmith license shall state, among other things that may be required, the name of the applicant, the name under which the applicant will do business, and the location by street, number, and city of the office of the business for which the license is sought.

(c) No license shall be issued in any fictitious name that may be
 confused with, or that is similar to, any federal, state, county, or municipal governmental function or agency, or to any law enforcement agency, or in any name that may tend to describe any business function or enterprise not actually engaged in by the applicant.

(d) No license shall be issued in any fictitious name that is misleading or would constitute false advertising.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 1.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.18.

(a) Each individual applicant, each partner of a partnership, and designated officers of a corporation shall submit with the application one personal identification form provided by the chief upon which shall appear a photograph taken within one year immediately preceding the date of the filing of the application, together with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, and a personal description of each person, respectively. Any photograph submitted by an applicant shall measure 114 by 112 inches, with a face size no greater than 1 by 114 inches. The identification form shall include residence addresses and employment history for the previous five years.

(b) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.19.

If the applicant for a license is an individual, the application shall state the full name of the individual, the full residence address of the applicant, and that the applicant is to be personally and actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.20.

If the applicant for a license is a partnership, the application shall state the true names and addresses of all the general partners and the name of the partner to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed under penalty of perjury by all of the general partners.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.21.

(a) If the applicant for a license is a corporation, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of the chief executive officer, secretary, chief financial officer, and any other corporate officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. The corporation identification number issued by the Secretary of State shall be indicated on the application. The application shall also state the name and address of a designated person to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a duly authorized officer of the applicant under penalty of perjury.

(b) Except as herein otherwise provided, no individual shall be placed in active charge of the business if the individual has ever had a license revoked for cause or has ever been disqualified from further employment in the locksmith business pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.22.

No new or original license shall be issued to any applicant pending final disposition of any disciplinary action previously filed against the person or applicant or partner, or officer of the applicant, or pending final disposition of any disciplinary action related to the locksmith business previously filed in another state against the person or applicant or partner, or officer of the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.23.

The chief shall issue a pocket identification card to the owner, partners, and officers. The chief shall determine the form and content of the card. The pocket card shall be composed of durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse the department for costs for furnishing the pocket card. The fee charged may not exceed the actual cost for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide the service, and may not exceed six dollars ($6).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 401, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.24.

The director shall issue a license, the form and content of which shall be determined in accordance with Section 164. In addition, the director shall issue a “Certificate of Licensure” to any licensee, upon request, with the fee prescribed in this chapter. A “Certificate of Licensure” shall include an embossed seal of the State of California and the signature of the chief or his or her designated representative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.25.

If an applicant fails to complete his or her application within one year after it has been filed, the application shall be considered to be abandoned. An application submitted subsequent to the abandonment of a former application shall be treated as a new application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.26.

(a) Each locksmith license, together with the current renewal certificate, if any, shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place of business, each branch office, and in each mobile service vehicle for which the license is issued.

(b) The director may assess a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation of subdivision (a). These fines shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.27.

Every locksmith license shall expire at 12 midnight of the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance unless renewed; provided however, that the bureau may establish procedures, pursuant to Sections 152.5 and 152.6, for the administration of a staggered license renewal program. To renew an unexpired license or registration, the licensee shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, pay any and all fines assessed by the chief or the director which are not pending appeal, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. On renewal, such evidence of renewal of the license or registration as the director may prescribe shall be issued to the licensee. The bureau shall send to each licensee a notice of renewal at least 45 calendar days prior to the expiration of each unexpired license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.28.

A locksmith license not renewed within three years following its expiration may not be renewed thereafter. Renewal of the license within three years, or issuance of an original license thereafter, shall be subject to payment of any and all fines assessed by the chief or the director which are not pending appeal and all other applicable fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 13.3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.29.

A suspended locksmith license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended. The bureau shall not issue a license renewal certificate on a suspended license until the period of suspension has terminated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.30.

A locksmith whose license has been canceled pursuant to this article, may obtain a new license only upon compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an initial license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.31.

No license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be transferred to another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.32.

Every licensee shall notify the bureau, in writing, within 30 days, of any change of residence or business address.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.33.

A licensee, or a partner or officer of a licensee, shall carry a valid pocket identification card, issued by the bureau pursuant to Section 6980.23, and either a valid driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code or a valid identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code, at all times the licensee, or partner or officer, is engaged in the work of a locksmith, as defined in this chapter, whether on or off the premises of the licensee’s place of business. Every person, while engaged in any activity for which licensure is required, shall display his or her valid pocket card, and driver’s license or identification card, as provided by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licensed and Registered Locations [6980.34. - 6980.41.]

6980.34.

(a) Every application for a locksmith license in which the person applying desires to have the license issued under a fictitious business name shall include a certified copy of the fictitious business name statement filed with the county clerk pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7.

(b) A licensee desiring to operate a locksmith business under one or more fictitious business names shall apply and qualify for an initial license for each fictitious business name.

(c) No licensee shall indicate, or cause to be indicated, in any printed matter, or in any directory or listing, that he or she conducts a locksmith business under any name, other than the name for which he or she is licensed.

(d) An application for a license for an additional fictitious business name shall be in the same form, and the applicant shall meet the same requirements, as for an initial license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1275, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.35.

A licensee desiring to operate a locksmith business at a location other than the principal place of business as shown on the license shall apply for a branch office registration for each additional location as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.37.

A licensee who maintains or proposes to maintain a branch office as defined in this article, shall apply and qualify for a branch office registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.38.

An application for a branch office registration under this article shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by the fee as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.39.

An application for a branch office registration shall include:

(a) The full name and address of, and the telephone number at, the principal licensed location, and the license number of the applicant.

(b) The address of, and the telephone number at, the branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.40.

Upon receipt of the application for a branch office registration, the chief shall issue a “Branch Office Registration.” The registration shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the branch office location.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.41.

Every branch office registration issued under this chapter shall be subject to the same renewal provisions which apply to a license as provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Registration of Employees [6980.42. - 6980.50.]

6980.42.

(a) Within seven days after commencing employment, any employee of a locksmith who is not currently registered with the bureau and who is performing the services of a locksmith shall submit to the bureau a completed application for registration, two classifiable fingerprint cards, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, and the appropriate registration fee. No application is required to be submitted if the employee terminated employment within seven days. “Within seven days” means 168 hours from the time an employee provides any service for which he or she shall be compensated by a licensee.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an employee of a licensee may be assigned to work with a temporary registration card issued by the licensee until the bureau issues a registration card or denies the application for registration. A temporary registration card shall in no event be valid for more than 120 days. However, the director may extend the expiration date beyond the 120 days if there is an abnormal delay in processing applications for locksmith employees. For purposes of this section, the 120-day period shall commence on the date the applicant signs the application.

(c) An employee who has been convicted of a crime prior to applying for a position as a locksmith employee performing the services of a locksmith shall not be issued a temporary registration card and shall not be assigned to work as a locksmith until the bureau issues a permanent registration card. This subdivision shall apply only if the applicant for registration has disclosed the conviction to the bureau on his or her application form, or if the fact of the conviction has come to the attention of the bureau through official court or other governmental documents.

(d) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.
